Massachusetts, session 194th, H1565.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following new section:-
31. The executive office of housing and liveable communities or designee shall establish
an education and training program for all new and existing members of mobile home rent control
boards to be offered annually during a period determined by the executive office or designee.
The executive office or designee shall consult with the Massachusetts Municipal Association in
the development of said program. All education and training courses shall be made available to
board members free of charge and offered in multiple and equitable locations throughout the
commonwealth as well as by online-only methods.
of 1